th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำตัวกลอง: อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; แอช; เบสวูด; บีช; เบิร์ช; ทองเหลือง; บูบิงกา; คอมโพสิต (ไฮบริด); ไฟเบอร์กลาส; มะฮอกกานี; เมเปิล; โอ๊ก; ป็อปลาร์; เหล็ก; วอลนัต; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Material oboda bobna: Akril; Aluminij; Jesen; Lipa; Bukev; Breza; Medenina; Bubinga; Kompozit (hibrid); Steklena vlakna; Mahagonij; Javor; Hrast; Topol; Jeklo; Oreh; Drugo
da: Trommens skalmateriale: Akryl; Aluminium; Ask; Lind; Bøg; Birk; Messing; Bubinga; Komposit (hybrid); Glasfiber; Mahogni; Ahorn; Eg; Poppel; Stål; Valnød; Andet
it: Materiale della cassa del tamburo: Acrilico; Alluminio; Frassino; Tiglio; Faggio; Betulla; Ottone; Bubinga; Composito (ibrido); Fibra di vetro; Mogano; Acero; Rovere; Pioppo; Acciaio; Noce; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál korpusu bubna: Akryl; Hliník; Jaseň; Lipa; Buk; Breza; Mosadz; Bubinga; Kompozit (hybridný); Sklolaminát; Mahagón; Javor; Dub; Topoľ; Oceľ; Orech; Iné
vi: Chất liệu vỏ trống: Acrylic; Nhôm; Gỗ tần bì; Gỗ đoạn; Gỗ dẻ gai; Gỗ bạch dương; Đồng thau; Gỗ bubinga; Vật liệu tổng hợp (lai); Sợi thủy tinh; Gỗ gụ; Gỗ phong; Gỗ sồi; Gỗ dương; Thép; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
hr-HR: Materijal školjke bubnja: Akril; Aluminij; Jasen; Lipa; Bukva; Breza; Mjed; Bubinga; Kompozit (hibrid); Stakloplastika; Mahagonij; Javor; Hrast; Topola; Čelik; Orah; Ostalo
pl: Materiał korpusu bębna: Akryl; Aluminium; Jesion; Lipa; Buk; Brzoza; Mosiądz; Bubinga; Kompozyt (hybryda); Włókno szklane; Mahoń; Klon; Dąb; Topola; Stal; Orzech; Inny
zh-CN: 鼓腔材质: 亚克力; 铝; 水曲柳; 椴木; 山毛榉; 桦木; 黄铜; 古夷苏木; 复合材料（混合）; 玻璃纤维; 桃花心木; 枫木; 橡木; 杨木; 钢; 胡桃木; 其他
ja: ドラムシェル素材: アクリル; アルミニウム; アッシュ; バスウッド; ビーチ; バーチ; ブラス; ブビンガ; 複合素材 (ハイブリッド); ファイバーグラス; マホガニー; メイプル; オーク; ポプラ; スチール; ウォルナット; その他
tr: Davul kasası malzemesi: Akrilik; Alüminyum; Dişbudak; Ihlamur; Kayın; Huş; Pirinç; Bubinga; Kompozit (hibrit); Fiberglas; Maun; Akçaağaç; Meşe; Kavak; Çelik; Ceviz; Diğer
fr: Matériau du fût: Acrylique; Aluminium; Frêne; Tilleul; Hêtre; Bouleau; Laiton; Bubinga; Composite (hybride); Fibre de verre; Acajou; Érable; Chêne; Peuplier; Acier; Noyer; Autre
nl: Materiaal drumketel: Acryl; Aluminium; Essenhout; Lindehout; Beukenhout; Berkenhout; Messing; Bubinga; Composiet (hybride); Glasvezel; Mahoniehout; Esdoornhout; Eikenhout; Populierenhout; Staal; Walnoothout; Anders
ro-RO: Materialul carcasei tobei: Acril; Aluminiu; Frasin; Tei; Fag; Mesteacăn; Alamă; Bubinga; Compozit (hibrid); Fibră de sticlă; Mahon; Arțar; Stejar; Plop; Oțel; Nuc; Altele
ru: Материал корпуса барабана: Акрил; Алюминий; Ясень; Американская липа; Бук; Береза; Латунь; Бубинга; Композит (гибрид); Стекловолокно; Махагони; Клен; Дуб; Тополь; Сталь; Орех; Другое
zh-TW: 鼓肚材質: 壓克力; 鋁; 梣木; 椴木; 山毛櫸木; 樺木; 黃銅; 花梨木; 複合材料 (混合); 玻璃纖維; 桃花心木; 楓木; 橡木; 白楊木; 鋼; 胡桃木; 其他
pt-PT: Material do corpo do tambor: Acrílico; Alumínio; Freixo; Tília; Faia; Bétula; Latão; Bubinga; Composto (híbrido); Fibra de vidro; Mogno; Ácer; Carvalho; Choupo; Aço; Nogueira; Outro
lt-LT: Būgno korpuso medžiaga: Akrilo korpusas; Aliuminis; Uosis; Liepa; Bukas; Beržas; Žalvaris; Bubinga; Kompozitas (hibridinis); Stiklo pluoštas; Raudonmedis; Klevas; Ąžuolas; Tuopa; Plienas; Riešutmedis; Kita
fi: Rumpujen runkomateriaali: Akryyli; Alumiini; Saarni; Lehmus; Pyökki; Koivu; Messinki; Bubinga; Komposiitti (hybridi); Lasikuitu; Mahonki; Vaahtera; Tammi; Poppeli; Teräs; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
ko: 드럼 쉘 소재: 아크릴; 알루미늄; 물푸레나무; 피나무; 너도밤나무; 자작나무; 황동; 부빙가; 복합재 (하이브리드); 유리 섬유; 마호가니; 단풍나무; 참나무; 포플러; 스틸; 호두나무; 기타
de: Material des Trommelkessels: Acryl; Aluminium; Esche; Linde; Buche; Birke; Messing; Bubinga; Verbundstoff (Hybrid); Fiberglas; Mahagoni; Ahorn; Eiche; Pappel; Stahl; Walnuss; Sonstige
es: Material de carcasa de tambor: Acrílico; Aluminio; Fresno; Tilo; Haya; Abedul; Latón; Bubinga; Material compuesto (híbrido); Fibra de vidrio; Caoba; Arce; Roble; Álamo; Acero; Nogal; Otro
cs: Materiál korpusu bubnu: Akryl; Hliník; Jasan; Lípa; Buk; Bříza; Mosaz; Bubinga; Kompozit (hybrid); Sklolaminát; Mahagon; Javor; Dub; Topol; Ocel; Ořech; Ostatní
pt-BR: Material do casco do tambor de bateria: Acrílico; Alumínio; Freixo; Basswood; Faia; Bétula; Latão; Bubinga; Composto (híbrido); Fibra de vidro; Mogno; Maple; Carvalho; Choupo; Aço; Nogueira; Outro
el: Υλικό κελύφους τυμπάνου: Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Δεσποτάκι; Φλαμουριά; Οξιά; Σημύδα; Ορείχαλκος; Μπουμπίνγκα; Σύνθετο (υβριδικό); Fiberglass; Μαόνι; Σφένδαμος; Δρυς; Λεύκα; Ατσάλι; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
nb: Materiale i trommekropp: Akryl; Aluminium; Ask; Lind; Bøk; Bjørk; Messing; Bubinga; Kompositt (hybrid); Glassfiber; Mahogni; Lønn; Eik; Poppel; Stål; Valnøtt; Annet
hu: Dobtest anyaga: Akril; Alumínium; Kőris; Hársfa; Bükk; Nyírfa; Sárgaréz; Bubinga; Kompozit (hibrid); Üvegszál; Mahagóni; Juhar; Tölgy; Nyárfa; Acél; Diófa; Egyéb
sv: Trumskalets material: Akryl; Aluminium; Ask; Svartlind; Bok; Björk; Mässing; Bubinga; Komposit (hybrid); Glasfiber; Mahogny; Lönn; Ek; Poppel; Stål; Valnöt; Övrigt
bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на барабана: Акрил; Алуминий; Ясен; Липа; Бук; Бреза; Месинг; Бубинга; Композитен материал (хибрид); Фибростъкло; Махагон; Клен; Дъб; Топола; Стомана; Орех; Друго
en: Drum shell material: Acrylic; Aluminum; Ash; Basswood; Beech; Birch; Brass; Bubinga; Composite (hybrid); Fiberglass; Mahogany; Maple; Oak; Poplar; Steel; Walnut; Other